Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20148-915
Examinations; costs; reports in lieu
of examination; director; powers.

The director may make examinations
of any bank holding company with one or more state-chartered bank subsidiaries
and each state-chartered bank subsidiary thereof, the cost of which shall
be assessed, in the manner set forth in sections 8-605 and 8-606, against
and paid for by such bank holding company. The director may accept reports
of examination made by the Federal Reserve Board, the Comptroller of the Currency, the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or a foreign state agency in lieu of
making an examination by the department. The director may provide reports
of examination conducted by the department or other confidential information
to any of such regulatory entities. The director may contract with any of
such regulatory entities to conduct and pay for such an examination for the
department. The director may contract with any of such regulatory entities
to conduct and receive payment for such an examination for any of such regulatory
entities. The director may enter into cooperative agreements with any or all
of such regulatory entities to foster the purposes of the Nebraska Bank Holding
Company Act of 1995.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 26;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 15;

Laws 2013, LB213, § 12.